Idaho, session 2026, S1432.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. INDIRECT SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $2,789,400 $2,789,400
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund $40,000 40,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund $1,629,300 1,477,100 3,106,400
State Hospital North Endowment Income
Fund 305,000 305,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 0 4,733,800 85,000 4,818,800
TOTAL $1,629,300 $9,000,300 $430,000 $11,059,600


FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
II. INDEPENDENT COUNCILS - DOMESTIC VIOLENCE COUNCIL:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $40,000 $20,000 $60,000
GRAND TOTAL $1,669,300 $9,020,300 $430,000 $11,119,600
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Divi-
sion of Indirect Support Services is hereby reduced by the following amounts
from the designated expense classes from the listed funds for the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
FROM:
CooperativeWelfare(General)
Fund $2,600,800 $2,600,800
CooperativeWelfare(Dedicated)
Fund 1,629,300 $1,477,100 3,106,400
CooperativeWelfare(Federal)
Fund 4,547,500 0 4,547,500
TOTAL $8,777,600 $1,477,100 $10,254,700
SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, the full-time equivalent position authorization pro-
vided to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Division of Indirect
Support Services is hereby reduced by fifty-eight (58.00) for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the Division of Licensing and Certifica-
tion may transfer moneys appropriated for personnel costs and trustee and
benefit payments pursuant to Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.